District of Columbia statutes.
16-1334

Retention, for public use, of excess property.

When the authorities of the District of Columbia having jurisdiction of real property, rights, or easements acquired pursuant to this subchapter, elect to retain any of them for the use of the District, they may use the property, rights or easements for park, playground, highway, or alley purposes, or for any other lawful purpose that they deem advantageous or in the public interest.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 576, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 558, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(f)(10)
1973 Ed., § 16-1334.
1981 Ed., § 16-1334.